California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Subject to the limitations in paragraph (3) of this subdivision, only the following laboratories are authorized to analyze crime scene samples and other forensic identification samples of known and unknown origin and to upload and compare those profiles against available state and national DNA and forensic identification databanks and databases in order to establish identity and origin of samples for forensic identification purposes pursuant to this chapter:

(1) The DNA laboratories of the Department of Justice that meet state and federal requirements, including the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) Quality Assurance Standards, and that are accredited by an organization approved by the National DNA Index System (NDIS) Procedures Board.

(2) Public law enforcement crime laboratories designated by the Department of Justice that meet state and federal requirements, including the FBI Quality Assurance Standards, and that are accredited by an organization approved by the NDIS Procedures Board.

(3) Only the laboratories of the Department of Justice that meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) are authorized to upload DNA profiles from arrestees and other qualifying offender samples collected pursuant to this section, Section 296, and Section 296.2.

(b) The laboratories of the Department of Justice and public law enforcement crime laboratories that meet the requirements of subdivision (a) may, subject to the laboratory’s discretion, and the limitations of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), upload to available state and national DNA and forensic identification databanks and databases qualifying DNA profiles from forensic identification samples of known and unknown origin that are generated by private forensic laboratories that meet state and federal requirements, including the FBI Quality Assurance Standards, and that are accredited by an organization approved by the NDIS Procedures Board. Prior to uploading DNA profiles generated by a private laboratory, the public laboratory shall conduct the quality assessment and review required by the FBI Quality Assurance Standards.

(c) (1) A biological sample obtained from a suspect in a criminal investigation for the commission of any crime may be analyzed for forensic identification profiles, including DNA profiles, by the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice or any law enforcement crime laboratory or private forensic laboratory that meets all of the FBI Quality Assurance Standards and accreditation requirements in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) and then compared by the Department of Justice in and between as many cases and investigations as necessary, and searched against the forensic identification profiles, including DNA profiles, stored in the files of the Department of Justice DNA databank or database or any available databanks or databases as part of the Department of Justice DNA Database and databank Program.

(2) The law enforcement investigating agency submitting a specimen, sample, or print impression to the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice or law enforcement crime laboratory pursuant to this section shall inform the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory within two years whether the person remains a suspect in a criminal investigation. Upon written notification from a law enforcement agency that a person is no longer a suspect in a criminal investigation, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall remove the suspect sample from its databank files and databases. However, any identification, warrant, arrest, or prosecution based upon a databank or database match shall not be invalidated or dismissed due to a failure to purge or delay in purging records.

(d) All laboratories, including the Department of Justice DNA laboratories, contributing DNA profiles for inclusion in California’s DNA databank shall meet state and federal requirements, including the FBI Quality Assurance Standards and accreditation requirements, and shall be accredited by an organization approved by the National DNA Index System (NDIS) Procedures Board. Additionally, each laboratory shall submit to the Department of Justice for review the annual report required by the submitting laboratory’s accrediting organization that documents the laboratory’s adherence to FBI Quality Assurance Standards and the standards of the accrediting organization. The requirements of this subdivision do not preclude DNA profiles developed in California from being searched in the NDIS.

(e) Nothing in this section precludes local law enforcement DNA laboratories from maintaining local forensic databases and databanks or performing forensic identification analyses, including DNA profiling, independently from the Department of Justice DNA laboratories and Forensic Identification Data Base and databank Program.

(f) The limitation on the types of offenses set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296 as subject to the collection and testing procedures of this chapter is for the purpose of facilitating the administration of this chapter by the Department of Justice, and shall not be considered cause for dismissing an investigation or prosecution or reversing a verdict or disposition.

(g) The detention, arrest, wardship, adjudication, or conviction of a person based upon a databank match or database information is not invalidated if it is determined that the specimens, samples, or print impressions were obtained or placed or retained in a databank or database by mistake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Collection and Forwarding of Samples [298. - 298.3.]

298.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Chief Administrative Officer of the detention facility, jail, or other facility at which the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions were collected shall cause these specimens, samples, and print impressions to be forwarded promptly to the Department of Justice. The specimens, samples, and print impressions shall be collected by a person using a Department of Justice approved collection kit and in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) The Department of Justice shall provide
 all blood specimen vials, buccal swab collectors, mailing tubes, labels, and instructions for the collection of the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumbprints. The specimens, samples, and thumbprints shall thereafter be forwarded to the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice for analysis of DNA and other forensic identification markers.

Additionally, the Department of Justice shall provide all full palm print cards, mailing envelopes, and instructions for the collection of full palm prints. The full palm prints, on a form prescribed by the Department of Justice, shall thereafter be forwarded to the Department of Justice for maintenance in a file for identification purposes.

(2) The withdrawal of blood shall be performed in a medically approved manner. Only health care
 providers trained and certified to draw blood may withdraw the blood specimens for purposes of this section.

(3) Buccal swab samples may be procured by law enforcement or corrections personnel or other individuals trained to assist in buccal swab collection.

(4) Right thumbprints and a full palm print impression of each hand shall be taken on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice. The palm print forms shall be forwarded to and maintained by the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information of the Department of Justice. Right thumbprints also shall be taken at the time of the collection of samples and specimens and shall be placed on the sample and specimen containers and forms as directed by the Department of Justice. The samples, specimens, and forms shall
 be forwarded to and maintained by the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice.

(5) The law enforcement or custodial agency collecting specimens, samples, or print impressions is responsible for confirming that the person qualifies for entry into the Department of Justice DNA Database and Databank Program prior to collecting the specimens, samples, or print impressions pursuant to this chapter.

(6) The DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice is responsible for establishing procedures for entering databank and database information.

(c) (1) Persons authorized to draw blood or obtain samples or print impressions under this chapter for the databank or database shall not be civilly or
 criminally liable either for withdrawing blood when done in accordance with medically accepted procedures, or for obtaining buccal swab samples by scraping inner cheek cells of the mouth, or thumb or palm print impressions when performed in accordance with standard professional practices.

(2) There is no civil or criminal cause of action against any law enforcement agency or the Department of Justice, or any employee thereof, for a mistake in confirming a person’s or sample’s qualifying status for inclusion within the database or databank or in placing an entry in a databank or a database.

(3) The failure of the Department of Justice or local law enforcement to comply with Article 4 or any other provision of this chapter shall not invalidate an arrest, plea, conviction, or disposition.

(d) This section shall become inoperative if the California Supreme Court rules to uphold the California Court of Appeal decision in People v. Buza (2014) 231 Cal.App.4th 1446 in regard to the provisions of Section 298 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 6 of the DNA Fingerprint, Unsolved Crime and Innocence Protection Act, Proposition 69, approved by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, in which case this section shall become inoperative immediately upon that ruling becoming final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 487, Sec. 2.   (AB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 487.   This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

298.

(a) (1) (A) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or the Chief Administrative Officer of the detention facility, jail, or other facility at which the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumb and palm print impressions were collected shall cause these specimens, samples, and print impressions to be forwarded promptly to the Department of Justice, except that a blood specimen or buccal swab sample taken from a person arrested for the commission of a felony as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 296 shall be forwarded to the Department of Justice only after one of the following has occurred, which shall be deemed a finding of
 probable cause, whichever occurs first:

(i) A felony arrest warrant has been signed by a judicial officer pursuant to Section 813 or 817.

(ii) A grand jury indictment has been found and issued pursuant to Section 939.8, 940, or 944.

(iii) A judicial officer has determined that probable cause exists to believe the person has committed the offense for which he or she was
 arrested.

(B) The specimens, samples, and print impressions shall be collected by a person using a Department of Justice approved collection kit and in accordance with the requirements and procedures set forth in subdivision (b).

(2) A blood specimen or buccal swab sample taken from a person arrested for the commission of a felony as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 296 that has not been forwarded to the Department of Justice within six months following the arrest of that person because the agency that took the blood specimen or buccal swab sample has not received notice to forward the DNA specimen or sample to the Department of Justice for inclusion in the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and
 Databank Program pursuant to paragraph (1) following a determination of probable cause, shall be destroyed by the agency that collected the blood specimen or buccal swab sample.

(b) (1) The Department of Justice shall provide all blood specimen vials, buccal swab collectors, mailing tubes, labels, and instructions for the collection of the blood specimens, buccal swab samples, and thumbprints. The specimens, samples, and thumbprints shall thereafter be forwarded to the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice for analysis of DNA and other forensic identification markers.

Additionally, the Department of Justice shall provide all full palm print cards, mailing envelopes, and instructions for the collection of full palm prints. The full palm prints, on a form prescribed by the Department of
 Justice, shall thereafter be forwarded to the Department of Justice for maintenance in a file for identification purposes.

(2) The withdrawal of blood shall be performed in a medically approved manner. Only health care providers trained and certified to draw blood may withdraw the blood specimens for purposes of this section.

(3) Buccal swab samples may be procured by law enforcement or corrections personnel or other individuals trained to assist in buccal swab collection.

(4) Right thumbprints and a full palm print impression of each hand shall be taken on forms prescribed by the Department of Justice. The palm print forms shall be forwarded to and maintained by the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information of the
 Department of Justice. Right thumbprints also shall be taken at the time of the collection of samples and specimens and shall be placed on the sample and specimen containers and forms as directed by the Department of Justice. The samples, specimens, and forms shall be forwarded to and maintained by the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice.

(5) The law enforcement or custodial agency collecting specimens, samples, or print impressions is responsible for confirming that the person qualifies for entry into the Department of Justice DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program prior to collecting the specimens, samples, or print impressions pursuant to this chapter.

(6) The DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice is responsible for establishing
 procedures for entering databank and database information.

(c) (1) Persons authorized to draw blood or obtain samples or print impressions under this chapter for the databank or database shall not be civilly or criminally liable either for withdrawing blood when done in accordance with medically accepted procedures, or for obtaining buccal swab samples by scraping inner cheek cells of the mouth, or thumb or palm print impressions when performed in accordance with standard professional practices.

(2) There is no civil or criminal cause of action against any law enforcement agency or the Department of Justice, or any employee thereof, for a mistake in confirming a person’s or sample’s qualifying status for inclusion within the database or databank or in
 placing an entry in a databank or a database.

(3) The failure of the Department of Justice or local law enforcement to comply with Article 4 or any other provision of this chapter shall not invalidate an arrest, plea, conviction, or disposition.

(d) This section shall only become operative if the California Supreme Court rules to uphold the California Court of Appeal decision in People v. Buza (2014) 231 Cal.App.4th 1446 in regard to the provisions of Section 298 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 6 of the DNA Fingerprint, Unsolved Crime and Innocence Protection Act, Proposition 69, approved by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, in which case this section shall become operative immediately upon that ruling becoming
 final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 487, Sec. 3.   (AB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally operative, as prescribed by its own provisions, coinciding with inoperation of the previous version, as amended by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 487.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

298.1.

(a) On and after January 1, 1999, any person who refuses to give any or all of the following, blood specimens, saliva samples, or thumb or palm print impressions as required by this chapter, once he or she has received written notice from the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, any law enforcement personnel, or officer of the court that he or she is required to provide specimens, samples, and print impressions pursuant to this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor. The refusal or failure to give any or all of the following, a blood specimen, saliva sample, or thumb or palm print impression is punishable as a separate offense by both a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) and imprisonment of up to one year in a county jail, or if the person is already
 imprisoned in the state prison, by sanctions for misdemeanors according to a schedule determined by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), authorized law enforcement, custodial, or corrections personnel, including peace officers as defined in Sections 830, 830.1, subdivision (d) of Section 830.2, Sections 830.38, 830.5, or 830.55, may employ reasonable force to collect blood specimens, saliva samples, or thumb or palm print impressions pursuant to this chapter from individuals who, after written or oral request, refuse to provide those specimens, samples, or thumb or palm print impressions.

(2) The withdrawal of blood shall be performed in a medically approved manner in accordance with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 298.

(3) The use of reasonable force as provided in this subdivision shall be carried out in a manner consistent with regulations and guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the Division of Juvenile Justice shall adopt regulations governing the use of reasonable force as provided in subdivision (b), which shall include the following:

(A) “Use of reasonable force” shall be defined as the force that an objective, trained, and competent correctional employee, faced with similar facts and circumstances, would consider necessary and reasonable to gain compliance with this chapter.

(B) The use of reasonable force shall not be authorized without the prior written authorization of the supervising officer on duty. The
 authorization shall include information that reflects the fact that the offender was asked to provide the requisite specimen, sample, or impression and refused.

(C) The use of reasonable force shall be preceded by efforts to secure voluntary compliance with this section.

(D) If the use of reasonable force includes a cell extraction, the regulations shall provide that the extraction be video recorded.

(2) The Corrections Standards Authority shall adopt guidelines governing the use of reasonable force as provided in subdivision (b) for local detention facilities, which shall include the following:

(A) “Use of reasonable force” shall be defined as the force that an objective, trained and competent correctional employee, faced with similar facts and
 circumstances, would consider necessary and reasonable to gain compliance with this chapter.

(B) The use of reasonable force shall not be authorized without the prior written authorization of the supervising officer on duty. The authorization shall include information that reflects the fact that the offender was asked to provide the requisite specimen, sample, or impression and refused.

(C) The use of reasonable force shall be preceded by efforts to secure voluntary compliance with this section.

(D) If the use of reasonable force includes a cell extraction, the extraction shall be video recorded.

(3) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Division of Juvenile Justice, and the Corrections Standards Authority shall report to the Legislature
 not later than January 1, 2005, on the use of reasonable force pursuant to this section. The report shall include, but is not limited to, the number of refusals, the number of incidents of the use of reasonable force under this section, the type of force used, the efforts undertaken to obtain voluntary compliance, if any, and whether any medical attention was needed by the prisoner or personnel as a result of force being used.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 71.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

298.2.

(a) Any person who is required to submit a specimen sample or print impression pursuant to this chapter who engages or attempts to engage in any of the following acts is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the state prison for two, three, or four years:

(1) Knowingly facilitates the collection of a wrongfully attributed blood specimen, buccal swab sample, or thumb or palm print impression, with the intent that a government agent or employee be deceived as to the origin of a DNA profile or as to any identification information associated with a specimen, sample, or print impression required for submission pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Knowingly tampers with any specimen, sample, print, or the collection container for any specimen or sample, with the intent that any government agent or employee be deceived as to the identity of the person to whom the specimen, sample, or print relates.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 14.   (AB 117)   Effective June 30, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, pursuant to Secs. 68 and 69 of Ch. 39.    Note: This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

298.3.

(a) To ensure expeditious and economical processing of offender specimens and samples for inclusion in the FBI’s CODIS System and the state’s DNA Database and Data Bank Program, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory is authorized to contract with other laboratories, whether public or private, including law enforcement laboratories, that have the capability of fully analyzing offender specimens or samples within 60 days of receipt, for the anonymous analysis of specimens and samples for forensic identification testing as provided in this chapter and in accordance with the quality assurance requirement established by CODIS and ASCLD/LAB.

(b) Contingent upon the availability of sufficient funds in the state’s DNA Identification Fund established pursuant to Section 76104.6, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory shall immediately contract with other laboratories, whether public or private, including law enforcement laboratories, for the anonymous analysis of offender reference specimens or samples and any arrestee reference specimens or samples collected pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 296 for forensic identification testing as provided in subdivision (a) of this section and in accordance with the quality assurance requirements established by CODIS and ASCLD/LAB for any specimens or samples that are not fully analyzed and uploaded into the CODIS database within six months of the receipt of the reference specimens or samples by the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory.

(History: Added November 2, 2004, by initiative Proposition 69, Sec. 8.   Note: Prop. 69 is titled the DNA Fingerprint, Unsolved Crime and Innocence Protection Act.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Expungement of Information [299. - 299.]

299.

(a) A person whose DNA profile has been included in the databank pursuant to this chapter shall have his or her DNA specimen and sample destroyed and searchable database profile expunged from the databank program pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (b) if the person has no past or present offense or pending charge which qualifies that person for inclusion within the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program and there otherwise is no legal basis for retaining the specimen or sample or searchable profile.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), a person who has no past or present qualifying offense, and for whom
 there otherwise is no legal basis for retaining the specimen or sample or searchable profile, may make a written request to have his or her specimen and sample destroyed and searchable database profile expunged from the databank program if any of the following apply:

(1) Following arrest, no accusatory pleading has been filed within the applicable period allowed by law, charging the person with a qualifying offense as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 296 or if the charges which served as the basis for including the DNA profile in the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program have been dismissed prior to adjudication by a trier of fact;

(2) The underlying conviction or disposition serving as the basis for including the DNA profile has been
 reversed and the case dismissed;

(3) The person has been found factually innocent of the underlying offense pursuant to Section 851.8, or Section 781.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code; or

(4) The defendant has been found not guilty or the defendant has been acquitted of the underlying offense.

(c) (1) The person requesting the databank entry to be expunged must send a copy of his or her request to the trial court of the county where the arrest occurred, or that entered the conviction or rendered disposition in the case, to the DNA Laboratory of the Department of Justice, and to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which he or she was arrested or, convicted, or adjudicated, with proof of
 service on all parties. The court has the discretion to grant or deny the request for expungement. The denial of a request for expungement is a nonappealable order and shall not be reviewed by petition for writ.

(2) Except as provided in this section, the Department of Justice shall destroy a specimen and sample and expunge the searchable DNA database profile pertaining to the person who has no present or past qualifying offense of record upon receipt of a court order that verifies the applicant has made the necessary showing at a noticed hearing, and that includes all of the following:

(A) The written request for expungement pursuant to this section.

(B) A certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the
 conviction or case, or a letter from the district attorney certifying that no accusatory pleading has been filed or the charges which served as the basis for collecting a DNA specimen and sample have been dismissed prior to adjudication by a trier of fact, the defendant has been found factually innocent, the defendant has been found not guilty, the defendant has been acquitted of the underlying offense, or the underlying conviction has been reversed and the case dismissed.

(C) Proof of written notice to the prosecuting attorney and the Department of Justice that expungement has been requested.

(D) A court order verifying that no retrial or appeal of the case is pending, that it has been at least 180 days since the defendant or minor has notified the prosecuting attorney and the
 Department of Justice of the expungement request, and that the court has not received an objection from the Department of Justice or the prosecuting attorney.

(d) Upon order from the court, the Department of Justice shall destroy any specimen or sample collected from the person and any searchable DNA database profile pertaining to the person, unless the department determines that the person is subject to the provisions of this chapter because of a past qualifying offense of record or is or has otherwise become obligated to submit a blood specimen or buccal swab sample as a result of a separate arrest, conviction, juvenile adjudication, or finding of guilty or not guilty
 by reason of insanity for an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or as a condition of a plea.

The Department of Justice is not required to destroy analytical data or other items obtained from a blood specimen or saliva, or buccal swab sample, if evidence relating to another person subject to the provisions of this chapter would thereby be destroyed or otherwise compromised.

Any identification, warrant, probable cause to arrest, or arrest based upon a databank or database match is not invalidated due to a failure to expunge or a delay in expunging records.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory is not required to expunge DNA profile or forensic identification information or destroy or return
 specimens, samples, or print impressions taken pursuant to this section if the duty to register under Section 290 or 457.1 is terminated.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including Sections 17, 1170.18, 1203.4, and 1203.4a, a judge is not authorized to relieve a person of the separate administrative duty to provide specimens, samples, or print impressions required by this chapter if a person has been found guilty or was adjudicated a ward of the court by a trier of fact of a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or was found not guilty by reason of insanity or pleads no contest to a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 296.

(g) This section shall become inoperative if the California Supreme Court rules to uphold the California
 Court of Appeal decision in People v. Buza (2014) 231 Cal.App.4th 1446 in regard to the provisions of Section 299 of the Penal Code, as amended by Section 9 of the DNA Fingerprint, Unsolved Crime and Innocence Protection Act, Proposition 69, approved by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, in which case this section shall become inoperative immediately upon that ruling becoming final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 487, Sec. 4.   (AB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 487.   This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

299.

(a) A person whose DNA profile has been included in the databank pursuant to this chapter shall have his or her DNA specimen and sample destroyed and searchable database profile expunged from the databank program if the person has no past or present offense or pending charge which qualifies that person for inclusion within the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program and there otherwise is no legal basis for retaining the specimen or sample or searchable profile.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (a), a person who has no past or present qualifying offense, and for whom there otherwise is no legal basis for retaining the specimen or sample or searchable profile
 shall have his or her specimen and sample destroyed and searchable database profile expunged from the databank program if any of the following apply:

(1) Following arrest, and after the applicable law enforcement agency has provided notice to the prosecuting attorney that the criminal case will not be presented to the prosecuting attorney for review, or after the applicable law enforcement agency has submitted a criminal case to the prosecuting attorney for review, no accusatory pleading has been filed within the applicable period allowed by law, charging the person with a qualifying offense as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section
 296, in which case the prosecuting attorney shall immediately, or as soon as practically possible, submit a letter to the Department of Justice indicating that an accusatory pleading has not been filed.

(2) The charges which served as the basis for including the DNA profile in the state’s DNA and Forensic Identification Database and Databank Program have been dismissed prior to adjudication by a trier of fact, in which case the court shall forward an order to the Department of Justice upon disposition of the case, indicating that the charges have been dismissed.

(3) The underlying conviction or disposition serving as the basis for including the DNA profile has been reversed and the case dismissed, in which case the court shall forward its order to the Department of Justice upon disposition of the case.

(4) The person has been found factually innocent of the underlying offense pursuant to Section 851.8, or Section 781.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, in which case the court shall forward its order to the Department of Justice upon disposition of the case.

(5) The defendant has been found not guilty or the defendant has been acquitted of the underlying offense, in which case the court shall forward its order to the Department of
 Justice upon disposition of the case.

(c) Except as provided in this section, the Department of Justice shall destroy a specimen and sample and expunge the searchable DNA database profile pertaining to the person who has no present or past qualifying offense of record upon receipt of the following:

(1) A certified copy of the court order reversing and dismissing the conviction or case, or a letter from the district attorney certifying that no accusatory pleading has been filed or the charges which served as the basis for collecting a DNA specimen and sample have been dismissed prior to adjudication by a trier of fact, the defendant has been found factually innocent, the defendant has been found not guilty, the defendant has been acquitted of the underlying offense, or the underlying
 conviction has been reversed and the case dismissed.

(2) A court order verifying that no retrial or appeal of the case is pending.

(d) Pursuant to this section, the Department of Justice shall destroy any specimen or sample collected from the person and any searchable DNA database profile pertaining to the person, unless the department determines that the person is subject to the provisions of this chapter because of a past qualifying offense of record or is or has otherwise become obligated to submit a blood specimen or buccal swab sample as a result of a separate arrest, conviction, juvenile adjudication, or finding of guilty or not guilty by reason of insanity for an offense described in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or as a condition of a plea.

The Department of Justice is not required to destroy analytical data or other items obtained from a blood specimen or saliva, or buccal swab sample, if evidence relating to another person subject to the provisions of this chapter would thereby be destroyed or otherwise compromised.

Any identification, warrant, probable cause to arrest, or arrest based upon a databank or database match is not invalidated due to a failure to expunge or a delay in expunging records.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory is not required to expunge DNA profile or forensic identification information or destroy or return specimens, samples, or print impressions taken pursuant to this section if the duty to register under Section 290 or 457.1 is
 terminated.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, including Sections 17, 1170.18, 1203.4, and 1203.4a, a judge is not authorized to relieve a person of the separate administrative duty to provide specimens, samples, or print impressions required by this chapter if a person has been found guilty or was adjudicated a ward of the court by a trier of fact of a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 296, or was found not guilty by reason of insanity or pleads no contest to a qualifying offense as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 296.

(g) This section shall only become operative if the California Supreme Court rules to uphold the California Court of Appeal decision in People v. Buza (2014) 231 Cal.App.4th 1446 in regard to the provisions of Section 299 of the
 Penal Code, as amended by Section 9 of the DNA Fingerprint, Unsolved Crime and Innocence Protection Act, Proposition 69, approved by the voters at the November 2, 2004, statewide general election, in which case this section shall become operative immediately upon that ruling becoming final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 487, Sec. 5.   (AB 1492)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.   This section was amended on Nov. 2, 2004, by initiative Prop. 69.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Limitations on Disclosure [299.5. - 299.7.]

299.5.

(a) All DNA and forensic identification profiles and other identification information retained by the Department of Justice pursuant to this chapter are exempt from any law requiring disclosure of information to the public and shall be confidential except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) All evidence and forensic samples containing biological material retained by the Department of Justice DNA Laboratory or other state law enforcement agency are exempt from any law requiring disclosure of information to the public or the return of biological specimens, samples, or print impressions.

(c) Non-DNA forensic
 identification information may be filed with the offender’s file maintained by the Sex Registration Unit of the Department of Justice or in other computerized data bank or database systems maintained by the Department of Justice.

(d) The DNA and other forensic identification information retained by the Department of Justice pursuant to this chapter shall not be included in the state summary criminal history information. However, nothing in this chapter precludes law enforcement personnel from entering into a person’s criminal history information or offender file maintained by the Department of Justice, the fact that the specimens, samples, and print impressions required by this chapter have or have not been collected from that person.

(e) The fact that the blood specimens, saliva or buccal swab samples, and print impressions required by this chapter have been received by the DNA
 Laboratory of the Department of Justice shall be included in the state summary criminal history information as soon as administratively practicable.

The full palm prints of each hand shall be filed and maintained by the Automated Latent Print Section of the Bureau of Criminal Identification and Information of the Department of Justice, and may be included in the state summary criminal history information.

(f) DNA samples and DNA profiles and other forensic identification information shall be released only to law enforcement agencies, including, but not limited to, parole officers of the Department of Corrections, hearing officers of the parole authority, probation officers, the Attorney General’s office, district attorneys’ offices, and prosecuting city attorneys’ offices, unless otherwise specifically authorized by this chapter. Dissemination of DNA specimens, samples, and DNA profiles and other
 forensic identification information to law enforcement agencies and district attorneys’ offices outside this state shall be performed in conformity with the provisions of this chapter.

(g) A defendant’s DNA and other forensic identification information developed pursuant to this chapter shall be available to his or her defense counsel upon court order made pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2.
